Maryland, session 2026, HB1261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 51 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 51. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY SAFETY ACT.
14–5101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ADAPTIVE CONTENT” MEANS CONTENT OR RESPONSES GENERATED OR
MODIFIED USING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE THAT CHANGE BASED ON USER INPUT,
STORED DATA, OR BEHAVIORAL PATTERNS.
(C) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY” MEANS ANY TOY, DEVICE, OR
PRODUCT SOLD TO A CONSUMER IN THE STATE THAT:
(1) EMPLOYS ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, MACHINE LEARNING,
ADAPTIVE ALGORITHMS, CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE,
BEHAVIORAL MODELING, OR SIMILAR COMPUTATIONAL PROCESSES; AND
(2) IS MARKETED AND SOLD TO, OR PRIMARILY USED BY, A CHILD.
(D) (1) “CHILD USER DATA” MEANS INFORMATION COLLECTED OR
INFERRED FROM A CHILD’S INTERACTION WITH AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY.
(2) “CHILD USER DATA” INCLUDES AUDIO, VIDEO, GEOLOCATION,
BIOMETRIC DATA, TEXT, BEHAVIORAL PATTERNS, AND RECORDED SPEECH.

HOUSE BILL 1261 3
(E) “CORE FUNCTIONALITY” MEANS THE FEATURES OF AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TOY THAT HAVE BEEN DESIGNED AND MARKETED FOR USE BY A
CHILD.
(F) “MANUFACTURER” MEANS A PERSON ENGAGED IN THE PRODUCTION,
DISTRIBUTION, IMPORTATION, OR SALE OF AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY IN
THE STATE.
(G) “PARENTAL CONSENT” MEANS VERIFIED PERMISSION FROM THE
PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF A CHILD.
(H) “REVIEW PANEL” MEANS THE CHILD ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY
SAFETY REVIEW PANEL.
(I) (1) “SAFE MODE” MEANS AN AUTOMATIC SECURITY FEATURE THAT
LOCKS OR DISABLES AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY OR FEATURES ON THE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY.
(2) “SAFE MODE” INCLUDES AUTOMATICALLY SHUTTING DOWN,
RESETTING, REDIRECTING, OR LOCKING THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY.
14–5102.
(A) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY PRODUCED, DISTRIBUTED,
IMPORTED, OR SOLD IN THE STATE MAY NOT:
(1) GENERATE, DISPLAY, OR COMMUNICATE CONTENT THAT:
(I) IS SEXUAL, VIOLENT, DISCRIMINATORY, OR OTHERWISE
INAPPROPRIATE FOR A CHILD;
(II) IS EMOTIONALLY MANIPULATIVE, INCLUDING BY
ENCOURAGING ISOLATION, SECRECY, OVERDEPENDENCE, OR EMOTIONAL
RELIANCE ON THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY;
(III) PROVIDES INSTRUCTION, ENCOURAGEMENT, OR ADVICE
ABOUT CRIMINAL ACTIVITY, SELF–HARM, SUBSTANCE USE, OR SEXUAL BEHAVIOR;
OR
(IV) INFERS, RECORDS, OR CATEGORIZES DEMOGRAPHIC OR
OTHER PERSONAL ATTRIBUTES OF A CHILD, INCLUDING RACE, RELIGION, SEXUAL
ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY, OR POLITICAL AFFILIATION; OR

HOUSE BILL 1261
(2) ENCOURAGE A CHILD TO INTERACT WITH THIRD–PARTY ONLINE
SYSTEMS, INCLUDING WEBSITES, APPLICATIONS, OR OTHER ONLINE DEVICES.
(B) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY PRODUCED, DISTRIBUTED,
IMPORTED, OR SOLD IN THE STATE SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A MECHANISM FOR EASILY OBTAINING AND REVOKING PARENTAL
CONSENT;
(2) A MECHANISM THAT DISABLES ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
FEATURES AND DATA COLLECTION FUNCTIONS IF PARENTAL CONSENT IS NOT
OBTAINED OR IS REVOKED;
(3) AGE–APPROPRIATE CONVERSATIONAL FILTERS TO BLOCK
HARMFUL OR INAPPROPRIATE DIALOGUE;
(4) CONTENT–MODERATION MECHANISMS THAT PREVENT THE
OUTPUT OF CONTENT PROHIBITED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION;
(5) AN AUTOMATIC SAFE MODE THAT IS ACTIVATED WHEN THE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY RECEIVES POTENTIALLY HARMFUL, UNKNOWN, OR
PROHIBITED INPUTS; AND
(6) THE CAPABILITY TO SECURELY UPDATE SOFTWARE OR
FIRMWARE TO ADDRESS VULNERABILITIES OR IMPROVE SAFETY.
14–5103.
(A) A MANUFACTURER SHALL CONDUCT A CHILD ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SAFETY ASSESSMENT FOR EACH ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY
PRODUCED, DISTRIBUTED, IMPORTED, OR SOLD IN THE STATE THAT:
(1) DESCRIBES FORESEEABLE RISKS OF OPERATING THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TOY; AND
(2) OUTLINES THE MITIGATION STRATEGIES FOR THE FORESEEABLE
RISKS IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY SAFETY ASSESSMENT SHALL BE
CONDUCTED:

HOUSE BILL 1261 5
(1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
BEFORE MARKETING OR SELLING AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY IN THE STATE;
(2) ON AN ANNUAL BASIS FOR EACH ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY
CONTINUING TO BE MARKETED OR SOLD IN THE STATE; AND
(3) FOLLOWING ANY SIGNIFICANT CHANGE MADE TO THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE FEATURES OF AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY.
(C) AN INITIAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SAFETY ASSESSMENT OF AN
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY SOLD OR MARKETED IN THE STATE ON OR BEFORE
JULY 1, 2026, SHALL BE CONDUCTED NOT LATER THAN JANUARY 1, 2027.
14–5104.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A
MANUFACTURER MAY ONLY COLLECT THE MINIMUM CHILD USER DATA NECESSARY
FOR THE OPERATION OF THE CORE FUNCTIONALITY OF AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TOY.
(2) CHILD USER DATA COLLECTED BY A MANUFACTURER SHALL BE
ENCRYPTED.
(B) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY MANUFACTURER MAY NOT:
(1) SELL, LEASE, OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER CHILD USER DATA TO A
THIRD PARTY;
(2) USE CHILD USER DATA TO TRAIN UNRELATED ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE MODELS OR SYSTEMS;
(3) USE CHILD USER DATA FOR TARGETED ADVERTISING; OR
(4) RETAIN CHILD USER DATA FOR MORE THAN 12 MONTHS UNLESS
THE MANUFACTURER OBTAINS RENEWED PARENTAL CONSENT.
(C) A MANUFACTURER SHALL ENSURE THAT THE PARENT OR LEGAL
GUARDIAN OF A CHILD USER OF AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY HAS THE ABILITY
TO:
(1) EASILY ACCESS, REVIEW, DOWNLOAD, AND DELETE ALL CHILD
USER DATA COLLECTED BY AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY; AND

HOUSE BILL 1261
(2) EASILY DISABLE CHILD USER DATA COLLECTION WITHOUT
DISABLING THE CORE FUNCTIONALITY OF THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY.
(D) IF A DATA BREACH OR SUSPECTED DATA BREACH INVOLVING CHILD
USER DATA OCCURS, A MANUFACTURER SHALL NOTIFY EACH READILY
IDENTIFIABLE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A CHILD ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY
USER WITHIN 48 HOURS AFTER THE MANUFACTURER DISCOVERING THE DATA
BREACH OR SUSPECTED DATA BREACH.
14–5105.
(A) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY SOLD OR DISTRIBUTED IN THE
STATE SHALL INCLUDE A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS LABEL:
(1) STATING THAT THE PRODUCT USES ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE;
AND
(2) DIRECTLY OR THROUGH THE USE OF A QUICK RESPONSE CODE:
(I) IDENTIFYING ANY TYPE OF DATA COLLECTED BY THE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY; AND
(II) IF INTERACTIONS WITH THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
TOY ARE STORED, TRANSMITTED, OR USED TO GENERATE ADAPTIVE CONTENT,
PROVIDING INFORMATION ON HOW THE INTERACTIONS ARE STORED,
TRANSMITTED, OR USED.
(B) A MANUFACTURER THAT PRODUCES, DISTRIBUTES, IMPORTS, OR SELLS
AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY IN THE STATE SHALL MAKE PUBLICLY
AVAILABLE AN EASILY ACCESSIBLE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SAFETY SUMMARY
REPORT USING PLAIN, EASILY UNDERSTANDABLE LANGUAGE IDENTIFYING:
(1) THE AGE RANGE THAT THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY IS
INTENDED FOR;
(2) RISKS IDENTIFIED IN THE USE OF THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SAFETY ASSESSMENT COMPLETED UNDER § 14–5103 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) THE RESULTS OF ANY TESTING OF THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TOY; AND
(4) DIRECTIONS THAT THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A CHILD USER
MAY USE TO CONTROL OR LIMIT DATA COLLECTION OR ADAPTIVE BEHAVIORS.

HOUSE BILL 1261 7
14–5106.
A MANUFACTURER MAY NOT:
(1) MARKET OR ADVERTISE AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY AS AN
EMOTIONAL COMPANION, PARENTAL SUBSTITUTE, OR PSYCHOLOGICAL
COUNSELOR;
(2) USE A RECORDING OF OR GENERATED CONTENT FROM CHILD
INTERACTIONS WITH THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY IN ANY MARKETING OR
PROMOTIONAL MATERIALS WITHOUT OBTAINING EXPRESS PARENTAL CONSENT; OR
(3) USE DATA COLLECTED FROM A CHILD USER OF AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TOY TO DEVELOP AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY
ADVERTISEMENT TARGETED AT CHILDREN.
14–5107.
(A) THERE IS AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOY SAFETY REVIEW PANEL
IN THE CONSUMER PROTECTION DIVISION OF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL.
(B) (1) THE REVIEW PANEL SHALL:
(I) REVIEW MANUFACTURER COMPLIANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) CONDUCT INDEPENDENT AUDITS OF ANY ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TOY MARKETED, SOLD, OR DISTRIBUTED TO CHILDREN IN THE
STATE; AND
(III) EVALUATE SAFETY STANDARDS AND MAKE
RECOMMENDATIONS FOR STATUTORY CHANGES BASED ON INDUSTRY BEST
PRACTICES.
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE REVIEW PANEL SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON
MANUFACTURER COMPLIANCE, THE RESULTS OF INDEPENDENT AUDITS, AND
POTENTIAL STATUTORY CHANGES.
14–5108.

HOUSE BILL 1261
(A) A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE PENALTIES UNDER TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE, A
MANUFACTURER THAT VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO:
(1) A CIVIL PENALTY UP TO $50,000 PER VIOLATION; AND
(2) A MANDATORY RECALL OF A NONCOMPLIANT ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TOY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.